Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE A. DRAINAGE DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 6609. HIDALGO COUNTY DRAINAGE DISTRICT NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 6609.0101. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Hidalgo County Drainage District No. 1.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 789 (H.B. 5373), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 6609.0102. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a conservation and reclamation district in Hidalgo County operating under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, as a drainage district and a water improvement district.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 789 (H.B. 5373), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

Sec. 6609.0103. FINDINGS OF BENEFIT AND PURPOSE. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects that are to be accomplished by the district under powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

(c) The district is essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 789 (H.B. 5373), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 6609.0201. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The district has all rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state applicable to a drainage district and a water improvement district created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, including Chapters 49, 55, and 56, Water Code.

(b) To the extent of a conflict between this chapter and Chapter 49, 55, or 56, Water Code, this chapter prevails. To the extent of a conflict between Chapters 55 and 56, Water Code, Chapter 55 prevails.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 789 (H.B. 5373), Sec. 1, eff. June 13, 2023.